Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2816
Writ; service and return.

Such writ may be served in any county by any sheriff of the same or of any other county. When such writ shall be issued by a court in session, if such court shall have adjourned when the same is returned, it shall be returned before any judge of the same court, and if such writ is returned before one judge at a time when the court is in session, he may adjourn the case into the court, there to be heard and determined.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 368, p. 808;

R.S.1913, § 9262;

C.S.1922, § 10291;

C.S.1929, § 29-2816;

R.S.1943, § 29-2816.